test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-5-itîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: nika-itikon
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kika-itikon
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-itikow
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: nika-itikonân
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kika-itikonaw
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kika-itikowâw
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-itikowak
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-itikothiwa
      

      # Inf # PV/ka

      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ka-ititân # I will say thus to you, I will say thus about you
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ka-itak # I will say thus to him/her, I will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ka-ititakwâw # I will say thus to you all, I will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ka-itakwâw # I will say thus to them, I will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ka-itaki # I will say thus to them, I will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-itimak # I will say thus to another/others, I will say thus about another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-isiyan # you will say thus to me, you will say thus about me
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ka-itat # you will say thus to him/her, you will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-isiyâhk # you will say thus to us, you will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-itacik # you will say thus to them, you will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-itimat # you will say thus to another/others, you will say thus about another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-isiyan # you will say thus to me, you will say thus about me
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ka-itisk # he/she will say thus to you, he/she will say thus about you
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-isiyâhk # you will say thus to us, you will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ka-itikoyâhk # you will say thus to us, you will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ka-isiyamiht # you will say thus to us, you will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ka-itikoyahk # he/she will say thus to you and us, he/she will say thus about you and us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ka-ititahk # he/she will say thus to you and us, he/she will say thus about you and us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ka-itikoyîk # he/she will say thus to you all, he/she will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ka-ititîk # he/she will say thus to you all, he/she will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-itacik # you will say thus to them, you will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-itimat # you will say thus to another/others, you will say thus about another/others
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-itimât # he/she will say thus to yet another/others, he/she will say thus about yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ka-ititâhk # we will say thus to you, we will say thus about you
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ka-itâyâhk # we will say thus to him/her, we will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-itakiht # we will say thus to him/her, we will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ka-ititâhk # we will say thus to you all, we will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ka-itâyâhkwâw # we will say thus to them, we will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-itakihcik # we will say thus to them, we will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-itimâyâhk # we will say thus to another/others, we will say thus about another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ka-itâyahk # we and you will say thus to him/her, we and you will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-itahk # we and you will say thus to him/her, we and you will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ka-itâyahkwâw # we and you will say thus to them, we and you will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-itahkwâw # we and you will say thus to them, we and you will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-itimâyahk # we and you will say thus to another/others, we and you will say thus about another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ka-isiyîk # you all will say thus to me, you all will say thus about me
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ka-itâyîk # you all will say thus to him/her, you all will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ka-isiyâhk # you all will say thus to us, you all will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ka-itâyîkwâw # you all will say thus to them, you all will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-itâyîkok # you all will say thus to them, you all will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-itimâyîk # you all will say thus to another/others, you all will say thus about another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [ka-isitwâw, ka-isicik] # they will say thus to me, they will say thus about me
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ka-itiskwâw # they will say thus to you, they will say thus about you
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ka-itikoyâhkwâw # they will say thus to us, they will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: ka-isiyamihcik # they will say thus to us, they will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ka-itikoyahkwâw # they will say thus to you and us, they will say thus about you and us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: ka-ititahkwâw # they will say thus to you and us, they will say thus about you and us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ka-itikoyîkwâw # they will say thus to you all, they will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: ka-ititîkwâw # they will say thus to you all, they will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-itâcik # they will say thus to another/others, they will say thus about another/others
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-itimâcik # they will say thus to yet another/others, they will say thus about yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ka-itimit # another/others will say thus to me, another/others will say thus about me
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ka-itimisk # another/others will say thus to you, another/others will say thus about you
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-itikot # another/others will say thus to him/her, another/others will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ka-itikoyâhk # another/others will say thus to us, another/others will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: ka-itikoyahk # another/others will say thus to you and us, another/others will say thus about you and us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: ka-itikoyîk # another/others will say thus to you all, another/others will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-itikocik # another/others will say thus to them, another/others will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-itâthit # another/others will say thus to yet another/others, another/others will say thus about yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-itikothit # yet another/others will say thus to another/others, yet another/others will say thus about another/others

      # X
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: ka-itikawiyân # someone will say thus to me, someone will say thus about me
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: ka-itikawiyan # someone will say thus to you, someone will say thus about you
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: ka-itiht # someone will say thus to him/her, someone will say thus about him/her
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: ka-itikawiyâhk # someone will say thus to us, someone will say thus about us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: ka-itikawiyahk # someone will say thus to you and us, someone will say thus about you and us
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: ka-itikawiyîk # someone will say thus to you all, someone will say thus about you all
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: ka-itihcik # someone will say thus to them, someone will say thus about them
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-itimiht # someone will say thus to another/others, someone will say thus about another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: ka-itikoyân
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: ka-itikoyan
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-itikot
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: ka-itikoyâhk
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: ka-itikoyahk
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: ka-itikoyîk
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-itikocik
      PV/ka+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-itikothit
      

      # Inf # PV/ta

      # 1Sg
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ta-ititân # I say thus to you, I say thus about you
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ta-itak # I say thus to him/her, I say thus about him/her
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ta-ititakwâw # I say thus to you all, I say thus about you all
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ta-itakwâw # I say thus to them, I say thus about them
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ta-itaki # I say thus to them, I say thus about them
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-itimak # I say thus to another/others, I say thus about another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-isiyan # you say thus to me, you say thus about me
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ta-itat # you say thus to him/her, you say thus about him/her
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-isiyâhk # you say thus to us, you say thus about us
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-itacik # you say thus to them, you say thus about them
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-itimat # you say thus to another/others, you say thus about another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ta-isiyan # you say thus to me, you say thus about me
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ta-itisk # he/she says thus to you, he/she says thus about you
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ta-isiyâhk # you say thus to us, you say thus about us
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ta-itikoyâhk # you say thus to us, you say thus about us
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ta-isiyamiht # you say thus to us, you say thus about us
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ta-itikoyahk # he/she says thus to you and us, he/she says thus about you and us
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ta-ititahk # he/she says thus to you and us, he/she says thus about you and us
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ta-itikoyîk # he/she says thus to you all, he/she says thus about you all
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ta-ititîk # he/she says thus to you all, he/she says thus about you all
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ta-itacik # you say thus to them, you say thus about them
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ta-itimat # you say thus to another/others, you say thus about another/others
      PV/ta+itîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ta-itimât # he/she says thus to yet another/others, he/she says thus about yet another/others
